Utah statutes.
72-2-113.    Rulemaking for cost limitations on contracts -- Auditing for compliance -- Federal accounting and audit standards.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules for determining the allowability of costs included in contracts entered into by the department for engineering and design services.  The rules shall comply with the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Section 112.

(2)  The department may require a provider of engineering or design services to submit annual audits or to submit to audits to determine compliance with the rules made under Subsection (1).  The audits may not be duplicative of federal audits under the Federal Acquisition Regulations System, 48 C.F.R. Part 31.

(3)  All engineering and design contracts and subcontracts entered into by the department shall be accounted for and audited in compliance with the Federal Acquisition Regulations System, 48 C.F.R. Part 31.

